Washington statutes.
RCW 16.60.040

Partition fence—Failure to build—Recovery of half of cost.

If, after notice has been given by either party and a reasonable length of time has elapsed, the other party neglect or refuse to erect or cause to be erected, the one-half of such fence, the party giving notice may proceed to erect or cause to be erected the entire partition fence, and collect by law one-half of the cost thereof from the other party.

[Code 1881 s 2493; 1873 p 448 s 6; 1871 p 65 s 6; 1869 p 325 s 6; RRS s 5446.]